lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX D Y 168
SFX D as      o               as
SFX D as      ui              as
SFX D as      à               as
SFX D as      u               as
SFX D as      e               [^ij]as
SFX D s       i               as
SFX D as      ø               as
SFX D s       ms              as
SFX D as      us              as
SFX D s       is              as
SFX D as      uose            as
SFX D ias     yje             ias
SFX D ias     y               ias
SFX D as      uje             jas
SFX D as      yje             jas
SFX D s       u               jas
SFX D s       o               [^djt]is
SFX D s       ui              [^djt]is
SFX D is      á               is
SFX D s       u               [^djt]is
SFX D is      yje             is
SFX D s       0               is
SFX D is      þio             dis
SFX D is      þiui            dis
SFX D is      þiu             dis
SFX D is      o               jis
SFX D is      ui              jis
SFX D is      u               jis
SFX D tis     èio             tis
SFX D tis     èiui            tis
SFX D tis     èiu             tis
SFX D ys      io              [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iui             [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      á               ys
SFX D ys      iu              [^djt]ys
SFX D s       je              ys
SFX D s       0               ys
SFX D ys      þio             dys
SFX D ys      þiui            dys
SFX D ys      þiu             dys
SFX D ys      o               jys
SFX D ys      ui              jys
SFX D ys      u               jys
SFX D tys     èio             tys
SFX D tys     èiui            tys
SFX D tys     èiu             tys
SFX D s       ai              [^djt]is
SFX D s       ø               [^djt]is
SFX D s       ams             [^djt]is
SFX D s       us              [^djt]is
SFX D s       ais             [^djt]is
SFX D s       uose            [^djt]is
SFX D is      þiai            dis
SFX D is      þiø             dis
SFX D is      þiams           dis
SFX D is      þius            dis
SFX D is      þiais           dis
SFX D is      þiuose          dis
SFX D is      ai              jis
SFX D is      ø               jis
SFX D is      ams             jis
SFX D is      us              jis
SFX D is      ais             jis
SFX D is      uose            jis
SFX D tis     èiai            tis
SFX D tis     èiø             tis
SFX D tis     èiams           tis
SFX D tis     èius            tis
SFX D tis     èiais           tis
SFX D tis     èiuose          tis
SFX D ys      iai             [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iø              [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iams            [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      ius             [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iais            [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iuose           [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      þiai            dys
SFX D ys      þiø             dys
SFX D ys      þiams           dys
SFX D ys      þius            dys
SFX D ys      þiais           dys
SFX D ys      þiuose          dys
SFX D ys      ai              jys
SFX D ys      ø               jys
SFX D ys      ams             jys
SFX D ys      us              jys
SFX D ys      ais             jys
SFX D ys      uose            jys
SFX D tys     èiai            tys
SFX D tys     èiø             tys
SFX D tys     èiams           tys
SFX D tys     èius            tys
SFX D tys     èiais           tys
SFX D tys     èiuose          tys
SFX D us      aus             us
SFX D s       i               us
SFX D us      ø               us
SFX D s       mi              us
SFX D s       je              us
SFX D s       j               us
SFX D us      au              us
SFX D us      ûs              [^ij]us
SFX D s       ms              [^ij]us
SFX D s       mis             [^ij]us
SFX D s       ose             us
SFX D us      ai              [ij]us
SFX D us      ams             [ij]us
SFX D us      ais             [ij]us
SFX D a       os              a
SFX D 0       i               a
SFX D a       à               a
SFX D a       oje             a
SFX D a       oj              a
SFX D a       ø               a
SFX D a       oms             a
SFX D a       om              a
SFX D 0       s               a
SFX D a       omis            a
SFX D a       ose             a
SFX D os      ø               os
SFX D s       ms              os
SFX D s       m               os
SFX D os      as              os
SFX D s       mis             os
SFX D 0       e               os
SFX D ti      èios            ti
SFX D ti      èiai            ti
SFX D ti      èià             ti
SFX D ti      èia             ti
SFX D ti      èioje           ti
SFX D ti      èioj            ti
SFX D ti      èiø             ti
SFX D ti      èioms           ti
SFX D ti      èiom            ti
SFX D ti      èias            ti
SFX D ti      èiomis          ti
SFX D ti      èiose           ti
SFX D 0       s               ë
SFX D ë       ei              ë
SFX D ë       æ               ë
SFX D ë       e               ë
SFX D 0       je              ë
SFX D 0       j               ë
SFX D ë       iø              [^dt]ë
SFX D ë       þiø             dë
SFX D të      èiø             të
SFX D 0       ms              ë
SFX D 0       m               ë
SFX D ë       es              ë
SFX D 0       mis             ë
SFX D 0       se              ë
SFX D ës      iø              [^dt]ës
SFX D tës     èiø             tës
SFX D ës      þiø             dës
SFX D s       ms              ës
SFX D ës      es              ës
SFX D s       mis             ës
SFX D 0       e               ës
SFX D ai      ø               ai
SFX D i       ms              ai
SFX D ai      us              ai
SFX D 0       s               ai
SFX D ai      uose            ai
SFX D ûs      ø               ûs
SFX D ûs      ums             ûs
SFX D ûs      us              ûs
SFX D ûs      umis            ûs
SFX D ûs      uose            ûs
