lib/dict/lt.dic
Abolai/D
Adalinavas/D
Adolfas/D
aerodromas/D
Agejevas/D
agurkienojas/D
aimanuoklë/D
ğakalas/D
Ağkinka/D
Akmenëlë/D
aktas/D
Alanas/D
Alejûnai/D
Algedë/D
şaliena/D
alytietë/D
Almanta/D
alsëdiğkis/D
Ğaltupë/D
Ğambalioniğkis/D
amûras/D
Andriejaièiai/D
angliakasys/D
ankstininkë/D
antğalas/D
antbûris/D
antklodë/D
antrametystë/D
Anulynas/D
apdulkintojas/D
apèiuopiamumas/D
apytema/D
apmovas/D
apsiuvas/D
apvoşalas/D
Ardiğkis/D
aristokratë/D
Arlovietë/D
Arnotiğkiai/D
Ğarvininkiğkë/D
aspiracija/D
atamanas/D
atjauta/D
atmata/D
atraişa/D
atskalûnas/D
atvamzdis/D
Audrûnas/D
Auguèiai/D
ğauklys/D
Aukğtamiğkis/D
Aukğtvilkiai/D
Auğrinë/D
autodromas/D
autuvas/D
Avişiğkës/D
Babrai/D
Bagdoniğkis/D
bajanistë/D
balaganas/D
Balèiğkiai/D
balselis/D
baltşiedë/D
baltukas/D
banginis/D
Baraviğkiai/D
Barystës/D
Barsûniğkiai/D
Barvainas/D
Batkûnai/D
Bazilius/D
bedievybë/D
Bekğai/D
bendraautoris/D
Benius/D
Berşiğkës/D
Berşonka/D
betvarkis/D
Bieliğkë/D
biliardinë/D
birşë/D
Birutis/D
Bygailiai/D
blakutë/D
blokada/D
Boşiai/D
Bradatiğkës/D
Bratoniğkës/D
briedragë/D
brokuotoja/D
Bruzguliai/D
Budriğkis/D
buèius/D
Bulavënai/D
bunkeris/D
burkuolis/D
Buteikiai/D
Butvinas/D
centas/D
chloras/D
cikadëlë/D
Cyrailë/D
daiga/D
dainininkas/D
Dalinava/D
Dangiras/D
Darata/D
Darginë/D
Dartautas/D
Daugarda/D
Daugirutis/D
Dauèiûnai/D
Dauşnagiai/D
Dûdelënai/D
degeneratë/D
Deimena/D
dekretas/D
demonstracija/D
dervuolis/D
diabetas/D
didşiûnas/D
Diekcioriğkës/D
Dikonëliai/D
Dimitriğkës/D
direktorë/D
disertantas/D
dizainerë/D
dûlë/D
Doèkiai/D
Donava/D
Dovydiğkis/D
draudikas/D
driblentë/D
droştukas/D
druskynas/D
dubuma/D
dulkinë/D
Duobgiriai/D
durpduobë/D
dvarininkas/D
dvikovininkë/D
Dzidiğkë/D
Edvardavas/D
Egëliğkës/D
Eiciûnai/D
Eigantë/D
ğeikas/D
Ğeimyniğkiai/D
Eisvaldas/D
áğeivis/D
ekscentrikë/D
ekstremalë/D
Elena/D
Şelviai/D
Ğemetiğkiai/D
Şemuèiai/D
Ğeğonys/D
Èerbiğkës/D
èerkğlë/D
Erta/D
estetizmas/D
Ğeğuoliai/D
faksimilë/D
fazë/D
fiksaşas/D
fistulë/D
fonetika/D
frakcininkas/D
Gabartai/D
gaidiena/D
Gaişënëliai/D
galaktika/D
ágaliojimas/D
Galviğkis/D
gangrena/D
garduolis/D
garstukas/D
gaublys/D
gaurys/D
Gedgailë/D
Gedvilaièiai/D
geidulys/D
geleşinkelietis/D
Gelvydas/D
geodezininkas/D
Gerlinda/D
Gervilë/D
giedris/D
Gilvainas/D
ginekologas/D
Gipënai/D
girgşdëlë/D
Girnupiai/D
gylys/D
gyvësis/D
Gëliogaliai/D
goşa/D
Gorainiai/D
Gracius/D
gramatika/D
Graşulënai/D
Greişënai/D
Gribşiniai/D
grikiena/D
griozdynë/D
grobinys/D
grumdynë/D
Gubertavas/D
gudragalvystë/D
Gumbë/D
Guotinës/D
Gutautë/D
Helë/D
hidrologë/D
hotentotë/D
èiaudulys/D
iğbëga/D
Idalija/D
iğduşa/D
Èiûşeliai/D
şievë/D
èigonë/D
Şièkiğkë/D
ğilagaidis/D
Ğilelis/D
èilietë/DN
ğilkuogë/D
Ğilvënai/D
iğmova/D
iğnara/D
şindulë/D
iniciatorë/D
inspiracija/D
intrigantë/D
Èiovydas/D
şirantas/D
èirkğlys/D
Irvainas/D
istorikë/D
Ğèiukiğkës/D
Ğèiurys/D
iğvarta/D
Izolda/D
şygininkas/D
şynystë/D
Jagminiğkiai/D
Janauka/D
Janutiğkë/D
Jaugilas/D
jaunëlë/D
jazminas/D
Jogilas/D
Jolanta/D
jonosfera/D
Jovaiğai/D
jûsiğkis/D
Juknonys/D
Juodaşeimiai/D
Juodiğkë/D
juodrağtis/D
Jurasiğkës/D
Jurğënai/D
kabardinas/D
Kağeliai/D
kaimietë/D
Kajackaraistis/D
ákalbëtoja/D
kalkdegë/D
Kalnyèia/D
kalvinë/D
kaminkrëtë/D
kanapa/D
Kaèëniğkiai/D
Kantuèiai/D
kaponë/D
karantinas/D
karibas/D
Karklë/D
Karosinë/D
karğtuma/D
kasininkas/D
Katarina/D
kağubas/D
kaulytoja/D
Kazaklioriai/D
këdainiğkis/D
kekğë/D
kelneris/D
kepaiğis/D
Kerkasiai/D
Kervelinë/D
kûgiakrovë/D
kiaunena/D
kiemininkas/D
Kikiğkës/D
Kilpinës/D
Kintai/D
Kirkğiai/D
kirtis/D
Kyburiai/D
klaikuma/D
Klausenë/D
kûlelis/D
kliedas/D
kliunkis/D
Klëtkininkai/D
kniauklys/D
kobaltas/D
kolekcininkë/D
komendantûra/D
komunija/D
konjunktas/D
kontûras/D
koranas/D
kosmonautë/D
Kragai/D
Krasenka/D
krautuvë/D
Kremesiğkës/D
Kriğèiûnienë/D
kristalas/D
Kryşinë/D
krosas/D
Krupğë/D
kuğetë/D
Kulskiai/D
Kuolonys/D
Kurënai/D
kvarklys/D
Lagesiai/D
laisvininkë/D
Landşiai/D
lapsostis/D
Lauksmë/D
Lazinkos/D
Ğlekiai/D
Lentvorai/D
Liaudbaras/D
Liepavas/D
Likpetriai/D
Linksmënai/D
Liubiğkiai/D
lydinys/D
ğlëktuvas/D
Lozorius/D
ğluota/D
magnetofonas/D
maşylë/D
Maleikënai/D
mama/D
manifestantas/D
Marcelinas/D
Markûnai/D
Mataitiğkë/D
mazgiklis/D
medynas/D
meğkauogë/D
meningitas/D
metinukas/D
Mieliatiltis/D
Mikieriai/D
Mileğkûnai/D
minamusë/D
Minvainë/D
mylia/D
mokytoja/D
Montviliğkiai/D
mûrinys/D
Murmuliai/D
Nainiai/D
Nariğkinas/D
Naujadarai/D
Navina/D
nelabystë/D
neregë/D
Nevieriğkës/D
Niûraièiai/D
Noreikoniai/D
novelistas/D
nuogalius/D
nuovargis/D
obuolienë/D
ğoksnis/D
opğrus/D
Osvaldas/D
pabaldûnas/D
padangë/D
Padurpinyèys/D
Pageleşiai/D
Pagudonë/D
Paşiurşmotis/D
Pakaniavys/D
pakluonë/D
Palaima/D
Paliğkëliai/D
pamaldos/D
Pamurmë/D
Papartëliai/D
papurëlë/D
Parieğës/D
pasaulëvaizdis/D
paslaptybë/D
pasvirnë/D
Patumğaliai/D
Pavakalnis/D
Pavinkğnis/D
Peèiuliai/D
penyba/D
perkûnsargis/D
perversmininkas/D
ğpicas/D
Pikèiûniğkës/D
pilnametë/D
pirklija/D
pjaustinys/D
platintojas/D
pliauğkalius/D
plongalys/D
Pogilas/D
polonistika/D
Poteronys/D
pralobëlis/D
prazeodimis/D
priebalsis/D
prieprotis/D
prizininkë/D
Prosperas/D
Pûsliai/D
puma/D
puris/D
puskarininkë/D
puğtûnë/D
Radmantë/D
Raièioniai/D
Rakğonys/D
rankinukas/D
Raudgiris/D
rûbininkë/D
reguliatorius/D
Reniûnai/D
Rëşgaliai/D
ğrilankietë/D
rinktuvas/D
rëklys/D
romuva/D
Rudamina/D
Rumğiğkës/D
sabalas/D
sakuotis/D
Samauka/D
sanskritas/D
Satkûnai/D
sausupë/D
sëbras/D
Selma/D
separacija/D
Siaurukai/D
sijonëlis/D
şàsininkë/D
Syderiğkiai/D
skambutis/D
Skersabalis/D
Skirvainë/D
skolintojas/D
áskroda/D
slankmatis/D
sëmë/D
Smiltynë/D
snobas/D
Spaèiûniğkiai/D
Spirgiukai/D
sàraiğa/D
Stagintrakis/D
Stareinë/D
stenografija/D
Stirbiğiai/D
Straşninkai/D
stuburgalis/D
sugaiğëlis/D
suodşius/D
sutuoktuvës/D
svetys/D
ğtabas/D
Tamağava/D
tarğkintojas/D
tarpvëşis/D
Tautgina/D
Teklinava/D
Tereslaukis/D
tikutis/D
Tyliûniğkë/D
Topeliğkës/D
tranas/D
tretininkas/D
triuğininkas/D
trupintuvas/D
turas/D
tëvavaldystë/D
şudytojas/D
Ğukiavietë/D
Ğulneliai/D
ğunybë/D
uostamiestis/D
Urlikiğkë/D
utilitaristë/D
Uşvarèiai/D
vaga/D
şvaigşdûnë/D
Vainiûnai/D
Vaitiğkiai/D
vağkininkë/D
valgytojas/D
vamzdşiapjûklis/D
Varda/D
Varlënai/D
vartûnas/D
vedëja/DR
veşliava/D
Ğvenèionys/D
Verğkuliai/D
viceprezidentë/D
vienakë/D
vietnamietë/DN
Vildûnai/D
Vilkiğkis/D
Şvingiai/D
virinys/D
visagalybë/D
Vitkiğkës/D
Vykintë/D
Vytara/D
vëluotojas/D
şvërija/D
zambë/D
zinija/D
